Mississippi, session 2026, HB1550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Legislative findings and purpose.  (1)  The Legislature finds that uncontrolled bleeding is a leading cause of preventable death following traumatic injury and that immediate bleeding control, including the use of tourniquets, can significantly increase survival until emergency medical services arrive. (2)  The purpose of this act is to encourage access to bleeding control equipment and training, promote public safety preparedness, and reduce preventable loss of life due to severe hemorrhage. SECTION 2.  Definitions. As used in this act, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this section: (a)  "Bleeding control kit" means a kit containing medical supplies designed to control life-threatening bleeding, which may include tourniquets, wound-packing gauze, compression bandages, gloves and instructional materials. (b)  "Stop the Bleed training" means evidence-based bleeding control education consistent with guidelines established by the American College of Surgeons or another nationally recognized authority. (c)  "Public building" means a building owned, leased or operated by a state agency, county, municipality, public school district, public community college district or state institution of higher learning. SECTION 3.  Voluntary statewide bleeding control program.  (1)  The State Department of Health, in coordination with the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency and the Department of Public Safety, may establish a voluntary statewide bleeding control program. (2)  The program may include, but is not limited to: (a)  Guidance regarding the placement and maintenance of bleeding control kits; (b)  Promotion of Stop the Bleed training opportunities; (c)  Coordination with local governments, public school districts, community college districts, state institutions of higher learning and nonprofit organizations; and (d)  Assistance in identifying federal or private grant funding for bleeding control supplies and training. SECTION 4.  Placement of bleeding control kits.  (1)  State agencies, counties, municipalities, public school districts, public community college districts and state institutions of higher learning may place bleeding control kits in public buildings, schools and other high-traffic public locations. (2)  Placement of such kits under this section shall be voluntary and subject to the availability of funding. SECTION 5.  Training encouraged.  (1)  State agencies, local governments, public school districts, community college districts, state institutions of higher learning are encouraged to offer Stop the Bleed training to employees, students and members of the public when feasible. (2)  Training may be conducted in partnership with emergency medical services providers, law enforcement agencies, fire departments, hospitals, trauma centers, or nonprofit organizations. SECTION 6.  Liability protection.  (1)  Any person who, in good faith and without compensation, renders emergency care or assistance using a bleeding control kit or tourniquet shall be immune from civil liability for acts or omissions resulting from such care, except for acts or omissions constituting willful or wanton misconduct. (2)  This section shall supplement, and not limit, the protections provided under Section 73-25-37 and other applicable Good Samaritan provisions of law. SECTION 7.  Funding. (1)  The program authorized under this act may be supported through: (a)  Federal grants; (b)  Private donations; (c)  Public-private partnerships; and (d)  Any other funds lawfully available. (2)  Nothing in this act shall be construed to require an appropriation of state funds. SECTION 8.  Construction. Nothing in this act shall be construed to: (a)  Require any individual to render emergency care; (b)  Restrict the lawful possession or use of medical devices; or (c)  Supersede existing emergency medical services protocols or regulations. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.